dev/verbs/Clean_FILE.lexc
Multichar_Symbols


! Part of speech categories
%<n%>          ! Noun                       
%<np%>         ! Proper noun                
%<adj%>        ! Adjective                  
%<num%>        ! Numeral                    
%<prn%>        ! Pronoun                    
%<det%>        ! Determiner                 
%<v%>          ! Verb                       
%<vaux%>       ! Auxilary verb              
%<adv%>        ! Adverb                     
%<post%>       ! Postposition               
%<postadv%>    ! Postadverb                 
%<cnjcoo%>     ! Co-ordinating conjunction  
%<cnjsub%>     ! Sub-ordinating conjunction 
%<cnjadv%>     ! Adverbial conjunction      
%<part%>       ! Particle                   
%<ij%>         ! Interjection               
%<abbr%>       ! Abbreviation               
%<cop%>        ! Copula                     
%<qst%>        ! Question particle
!%<ideo%>       ! Ideophone                  

! Proper noun types
%<top%>            
%<ant%>            
%<cog%>            
%<org%>            
%<al%>             

!! gender of anthroponyms 
%<m%>              ! Masculine    
%<f%>              ! Feminine     

! "Syntactic" tags. Attributive use of non-adjectives etc. !!!!! NOT SURE I WANT THIS !!!!
%<attr%>           ! Attributive
%<subst%>          ! Substantive
%<advl%>           ! Adverbial

! Number ! Сан ! Число
%<sg%>             ! Singular  
%<pl%>             ! Plural    
%<sp%>             ! Singular/Plural (used for formal personal pronoun)

! Possessives 
%<px1sg%>          ! First person singular
%<px2sg%>          ! Second person singular
%<px3sp%>          ! Third person singular/plural
%<px1pl%>          ! First person plural
%<px2pl%>          ! Second person singular
%<px%>             ! General possessive           ! NOT SURE I WANT THIS

! Cases ! "Case is a lie!" (quot.)

%<nom%>            
%<gen%>            
%<dat%>            
%<acc%>            
%<abl%>            
%<loc%>            
%<ins%>            ! Instrumental=comitative 


! Pronoun types ! Алмашлык төрләре ! Виды местоимений
%<pers%>           ! Personal
! Pronoun and determiner types
%<dem%>            ! Demonstrative
%<ind%>            ! Indefinite
%<itg%>            ! Interrogative
%<qnt%>            ! Quantifier
%<neg%>            ! Negative    ! NOTE: also used to denote negation in verbs ! what do you mean firespeake
r??
%<ref%>            ! Reflexive

!! Numeral types
%<ord%>            ! Ordinal
%<coll%>           ! Collective
%<dist%>           ! Distibutive

! Tense, aspect, mood
%<imp%>            ! Imperative
%<cond%>           ! Conditional  ! Шарт  ! Условное  !! -с{A}
%<caus%>           ! Causative
%<pass%>           ! Passive
%<coop%>           ! Cooperative

%<pres%>           ! -{A}
%<past%>           ! -{D}{I} 
%<evi%>            ! -m{I}s 
%<fut%>		   ! -{A}C{A}{K}  
%<aorcond%>	   ! conditional aorist arsa/rsa/irse


%<p1%>
%<p2%>
%<p3%>

%<sg%>
%<pl%>

%<necs%>                     ! Necessitive

%<ger1%>                     ! Gerund (verbal noun) 
%<ger2%>
%<ger3%>
%<ger4%>

%<gna1%>                     ! Verbal adverb
%<gna2%>                     ! Verbal adverb

%<gpr1%>                     ! Verbal adjective

%<prc1%>                     ! Participle

%{I%}
%{A%}

%{L%}
%{D%}

%{a%}
%{i%}

%{n%}		   ! Becomes "n" after a vowel, otherwise null
%{y%}		   ! Becomes "y" after a vowel, otherwise null
%{s%}		   ! Becomes "s" after a vowel, otherwise null
%{i%}		   ! Becomes as "i" after a consonant, otherwise null
%{pN%}		   ! Becomes "n" before dat abl loc and after 3p poss, otherwise null
%{t%}
%{ç%}

%{f%}              ! Enforce front harmony
%{b%}              ! Enforce back harmony


% 
%+
%-


LEXICON Root

Verbs ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ATTR ! Adjective inflection

# ; 
COP ; 

LEXICON V-TV-DIR-AR 

!!! Lexicon for transitive verbs taking the causative in -dir and the aorist in -AR !!!

%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AORIST-AR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FINITE-VERBS-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PASS-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REC-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REF-DIR-AR ;

LEXICON V-TV-DIR-IR

!!! Lexicon for transitive verbs taking the causative in -dir and the aorist in -IR !!!


%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AORIST-IR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PASS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REC-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REF-DIR-IR ;


LEXICON V-IV-DIR-AR 

!!! Lexicon for intrasitive verbs taking the causative in -DIR and the aorist in AR !!!

%<v%>%<iv%>: ABIL-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: ABIL-AR-CONDITIONAL;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AOR-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AORIST-AR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FINITE-VERBS-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-REC-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-REF-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;

LEXICON V-IV-DIR-IR

!!! LEXICON FOR INTRANSITIVE VERBS WITH CAUSATIVE IN DIR and aorist in IR !!!


%<v%>%<iv%>: ABIL-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AOR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AORIST-IR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-REC-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-REF-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;

LEXICON ABIL-AR

!!! Abilitative for verbs taking the aorist in IR; Please note that if there is an abilitative the following suffixes take the IR path, 
!!! as (a)bil moves the verb into an IR one. i.e. Yapabilirim and not Yapabilerim !!!

%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}bil FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}bil GERUND ;
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}bil NON-FINITE ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{A%} NON-FINITE ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{A%} PERS5 ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{a%} FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{A%} GERUND ;
FINITE-VERBS-AR ;
GERUND ;
NON-FINITE ;

LEXICON ABIL-IR

%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}bil FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}bil GERUND ;
%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}bil NON-FINITE ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{A%} PERS5 ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{a%} FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{A%} GERUND ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{A%} NON-FINITE ;
FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
GERUND ;
NON-FINITE ;

LEXICON ABIL-CONDITIONAL

%<abil%>%<cond%>:%>%{A%}bilse PERS2  ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>%<cond%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{A%}z%>s%{A%} PERS2-NO3PL ;
%<neg%>%<abil%>%<cond%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}m%{A%}z%>l%{A%}r%>s%{A%} # ;

LEXICON AOR-AR

!!! Simple Aorist (sic) can get either the endings listed in LEXICON PERS1 or the adverbial KEN !!!
!!! Archiphoneme %{A%} is either a or e i.e. yaparım / giderim !!!

%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r PERS1 ;
%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r KEN ;
%<neg%>%<aor%>:%> PERS5;
%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z KEN ;

LEXICON AOR-IR

%<aor%>:%>%{i%}r PERS1 ;
%<aor%>:%>%{i%}r KEN ;
%<neg%>%<aor%>:%> PERS5;
%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z KEN;

LEXICON AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL

!!! This may look a bit bizarre but the special sets of personal endings PERS2-NO3PL are used to get -mazlarsa read !!!

%<aorcond%>:%>%{A%}rs%{A%} PERS2-NO3PL  ;
%<aorcond%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}r%>l%{A%}r%>s%{A%} # ; 
%<neg%>%<aorcond%>:%>m%{A%}z%>s%{A%} PERS2-NO3PL ;
%<neg%>%<aorcond%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>m%{A%}z%>l%{A%}r%>s%{A%} # ;

LEXICON AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL

%<aorcond%>:%>%{i%}rs%{A%} PERS2-NO3PL  ;
%<aorcond%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}r%>l%{A%}r%>%s%{A%} # ; 
%<neg%>%<aorcond%>:%>m%{A%}z%>s%{A%} PERS2-NO3PL ;
%<neg%>%<aorcond%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>m%{A%}z%>l%{A%}r%>s%{A%} # ;

LEXICON AORIST-AR-PERFECT

%<aorp%>:%>%{A%}rd%{I%} PERS2-NO3PL  ;
%<aorp%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}r%>l%{A%}r%>d%{I%} # ; 
%<neg%>%<aorp%>:%>m%{A%}zd%{I%} PERS2-NO3PL ;
%<neg%>%<aorp%>:%>m%{A%}zl%{A%}rd%{I%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON AORIST-IR-PERFECT

%<aorp%>:%>%{i%}rd%{I%} PERS2-NO3PL  ;
%<aorp%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}r%>l%{A%}r%>d%{I%} # ; 
%<neg%>%<aorp%>:%>m%{A%}zd%{I%} PERS2-NO3PL ;
%<neg%>%<aorp%>:%>m%{A%}zl%{A%}rd%{I%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON CAUS-DIR-AR

!!! This is the causative in -dir. This suffix may go right after the stem or after Reflexive and Reciprocal !!!
!!! Duplication of CAUS-DIR in two branches is due to the nature of causative in DIR, making the following aorist always in -IR !!!

%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r NEG ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r ABIL-IR ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r NECE ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r NON-FINITE ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r PASS-DIR-AR ;
NEG ;
FINITE-VERBS-AR ;
ABIL-AR ;
NECE ;
NON-FINITE ;
PASS-DIR-AR ;

LEXICON CAUS-DIR-IR
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r NEG ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r ABIL-IR ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r NECE ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r NON-FINITE ;
%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r PASS-DIR-IR ;
PASS-DIR-IR ;
NEG ;
FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
ABIL-IR ;
NECE ;
NON-FINITE ;

LEXICON CONDITIONAL

%<cond%>:%>s%{A%} PERS2 ;

LEXICON CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL

%<condp%>:%>s%{A%}ym%{I%}ş PERS1 ;

LEXICON CONDITIONAL-PAST

%<condp%>:%>s%{A%}yd%{I%} PERS2 ;
